Idaho, session 2026, H0573.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-3302K, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-3302K. ISSUANCE OF ENHANCED LICENSES TO CARRY CONCEALED
WEAPONS. (1) The sheriff of a county, on behalf of the state of Idaho, must,
within ninety (90) days after the filing of an application by any person
who is not disqualified from possessing or receiving a firearm under state
or federal law and has otherwise complied with the requirements of this
section, issue an enhanced license to the person to carry concealed weapons
on his person. Licenses issued under this section shall be valid for five (5)
years from the date of issue.
(2) The sheriff must make license applications readily available at the
office of the sheriff, at other public offices in his jurisdiction and on the
website of the Idaho state police. The license application must be in a form
to be prescribed by the director of the Idaho state police and must meet the
following requirements:
(a) The license application shall require the applicant's name, ad-
dress, description, signature, date of birth, place of birth, military
status, citizenship and the driver's license number or state identi-
fication card number if used for identification in applying for the
license. If the applicant is not a U.S. citizen, the application shall
also require any alien or admission number issued to the applicant by
U.S. immigration and customs enforcement, or any successor agency;
(b) The license application may ask the applicant to disclose his
social security number but must indicate that disclosure of the appli-
cant's social security number is optional; and
(c) The license application must contain a warning that substantially
reads as follows:
CAUTION: Federal law and state law on the possession of weapons and
firearms differ. If you are prohibited by federal law from possess-
ing a weapon or a firearm, you may be prosecuted in federal court. A
state permit is not a defense to a federal prosecution.
(3) Any person who is applying for original issuance of a license to
carry concealed weapons must submit his fingerprints with the completed


application. Within five (5) days after the filing of an application, the
sheriff must forward the applicant's completed license application and
fingerprints to the Idaho state police. The Idaho state police must con-
duct a national fingerprint-based records check, an inquiry through the
national instant criminal background check system, and a check of any ap-
plicable state database, including a check for any mental health records
for conditions or commitments that would disqualify a person from possess-
ing a firearm under state or federal law, and must return the results to the
sheriff within sixty (60) days. If the applicant is not a U.S. citizen, an
immigration alien query must also be conducted through U.S. immigration and
customs enforcement or any successor agency. The sheriff shall not issue a
license before receiving and reviewing the results of the records check.
(4) The sheriff must deny an enhanced license to carry a concealed
weapon if the applicant is disqualified under any of the criteria listed in
section 18-3302(11), Idaho Code, or does not meet all of the following qual-
ifications:
(a) Is over the age of twenty-one (21) years;
(b) Has been a legal resident of the state of Idaho for at least six (6)
consecutive months before filing an application under this section or
holds a current license or permit to carry concealed weapons issued by
his state of residence; and
(c) Has successfully completed, within the twelve (12) months immedi-
ately preceding filing an application, a qualifying handgun course as
specified in this paragraph and taught by a certified instructor who is
not prohibited from possessing firearms under state or federal law. A
copy of the certificate of successful completion of the handgun course,
in a form to be prescribed by the director of the Idaho state police and
signed by the course instructor, must be submitted to the sheriff at the
time of filing an application under this section. Certified instruc-
tors of handgun courses when filing an application under this section
shall not be required to submit such certificates but must submit a copy
of their current instructor's credential. The sheriff must accept as a
qualifying handgun course a personal protection course offered by the
national rifle association or an equivalent, provided that all personal
protection or equivalent courses must meet the following requirements:
(i) The course instructor is certified by the national rifle as-
sociation, or by another nationally recognized organization that
customarily certifies firearms instructors, as an instructor in
personal protection with handguns, or the course instructor is
certified by the Idaho peace officers standards and training coun-
cil as a firearms instructor;
(ii) The course is at least eight (8) hours in duration;
(iii) The course is taught face to face and not by electronic or
other means; and
(iv) The course includes instruction in:
1. Idaho law relating to firearms and the use of deadly
force, provided that such instruction is delivered by either
any of the following whose name and credential must appear on
the certificate:


(A) An active, senior or emeritus member of the Idaho
state bar; or
(B) A law enforcement officer, active or retired, who
currently possesses or possessed at the time of his re-
tirement an intermediate or higher Idaho peace offi-
cers standards and training certificate; or
(C) An instructor certified by the national rifle
association, or equivalent, who has instructed an ap-
proved course for enhanced concealed carry for at least
eight (8) years;
2. The basic concepts of the safe and responsible use of
handguns;
3. Self-defense principles; and
4. Live fire training, including the firing of at least
ninety-eight (98) rounds by the student.
An instructor must provide a copy of the syllabus and a written descrip-
tion of the course of fire used in a qualifying handgun course that in-
cludes the name of the individual instructing the legal portion of the
course to the sheriff upon request.
(5) A license to carry concealed weapons must be in a form substantially
similar to that of the Idaho driver's license and must meet the following
specifications:
(a) The license must provide the licensee's name, address, date of
birth and the driver's license number or state identification card num-
ber if used for identification in applying for the license;
(b) The license must bear the licensee's signature and picture;
(c) The license must provide the date of issuance and the date on which
the license expires; and
(d) The license must be clearly distinguishable from a license issued
pursuant to section 18-3302, Idaho Code, and must be marked "Idaho en-
hanced concealed weapons license" on its face.
(6) Upon issuing a license under the provisions of this section, the
sheriff must notify the Idaho state police within three (3) days on a form or
in a manner prescribed by the Idaho state police. Information relating to an
applicant or licensee received or maintained pursuant to this section by the
sheriff or Idaho state police is confidential and exempt from disclosure un-
der section 74-105, Idaho Code.
(7) The fee for original issuance of an enhanced license shall be twenty
dollars ($20.00), which the sheriff must retain for the purpose of perform-
ing the duties required in this section. The sheriff may collect the actual
cost of any additional fees necessary to cover the processing costs lawfully
required by any state or federal agency or department, as well as the actual
cost of materials for the license lawfully required by any state agency or
department, which costs must be paid to the state. The sheriff must provide
the applicant with a copy of the results of the fingerprint-based records
check upon request of the applicant.
(8) The fee for renewal of the enhanced license shall be fifteen dollars
($15.00), which the sheriff must retain for the purpose of performing duties
required in this section. The sheriff may collect the actual cost of any ad-
ditional fees necessary to cover the processing costs lawfully required by


any state or federal agency or department, as well as the actual cost of ma-
terials for the license lawfully required by any state agency or department,
which costs must be paid to the state.
(9) Every license that is not, as provided by law, suspended, revoked or
disqualified in this state shall be renewable at any time during the ninety
(90) day period before its expiration or within ninety (90) days after the
expiration date. The sheriff must mail renewal notices ninety (90) days
prior to the expiration date of the license. The sheriff shall require the
licensee applying for renewal to complete an application. The sheriff must
submit the application to the Idaho state police. The Idaho state police
must conduct the same records checks as required for an initial license
under subsection (3) of this section and must return the results to the sher-
iff within thirty (30) days. The sheriff shall not issue a renewal before
receiving and reviewing the results of the records check and must deny a
license if the applicant is disqualified under any of the criteria provided
in this section. A renewal license shall be valid for a period of five (5)
years. A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of
the prior license. A licensee renewing ninety-one (91) days to one hundred
eighty (180) days after the expiration date of the license must pay a late re-
newal penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) in addition to the renewal fee, except
that any licensee serving on active duty in the armed forces of the United
States during the renewal period shall not be required to pay a late renewal
penalty upon renewing ninety-one (91) days to one hundred eighty (180) days
after the expiration date of the license. After one hundred eighty-one (181)
days, the licensee shall be required to submit an initial application for
an enhanced license and pay the fees prescribed in subsection (7) of this
section. The renewal fee and any penalty shall be paid to the sheriff for the
purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter. Upon renewing a license
under the provisions of this section, the sheriff must notify the Idaho state
police within five (5) days on a form or in a manner prescribed by the Idaho
state police.
(10) No city, county or other political subdivision of this state shall
modify or add to the requirements of this section, nor shall a city, county
or political subdivision ask the applicant to voluntarily submit any infor-
mation not required in this section. A civil action may be brought to enjoin
a wrongful refusal to issue a license or a wrongful modification of the re-
quirements of this section. The civil action may be brought in the county in
which the application was made or in Ada county at the discretion of the peti-
tioner. Any person who prevails against a public agency in any action in the
courts for a violation of this section must be awarded costs, including rea-
sonable attorney's fees, incurred in connection with the legal action.
(11) A county sheriff, deputy sheriff or county employee who issues a
license to carry a concealed weapon under this section shall not incur any
civil or criminal liability as the result of the performance of his or her du-
ties in compliance with this section.
(12) The sheriff shall have the power to revoke a license issued pur-
suant to this section subsequent to a hearing in accordance with the provi-
sions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, for any of the following reasons,
provided that the sheriff must notify the Idaho state police within three (3)


days on a form or in a manner prescribed by the Idaho state police of any such
revocation:
(a) Fraud or intentional misrepresentation in the obtaining of a li-
cense;
(b) Misuse of a license, including lending or giving a license to an-
other person, duplicating a license or using a license with the intent
to unlawfully cause harm to a person or property;
(c) The doing of an act or existence of a condition that would have been
grounds for the denial of the license by the sheriff;
(d) The violation of any of the provisions of this section; or
(e) The applicant is adjudicated guilty of or receives a withheld judg-
ment for a crime that would have disqualified him from initially receiv-
ing a license.
(13) An applicant who provides information on the application for an
enhanced license to carry a concealed weapon knowing the same to be untrue
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
(14) The attorney general must contact the appropriate officials in
other states for the purpose of establishing, to the extent possible, recog-
nition and reciprocity of the enhanced license to carry a concealed weapon
by other states, whether by formal agreement or otherwise. The Idaho state
police or the attorney general must keep a copy and maintain a record of all
such agreements and reciprocity recognitions that must be made available to
the public.
(15) Any license issued pursuant to this section is valid throughout the
state of Idaho and shall be considered an authorized state license.
(16) The Idaho state police must maintain a computerized record system
that is accessible to law enforcement agencies in any state for the purpose
of verifying current enhanced licensee status. Information maintained in
the record system shall be confidential and exempt from disclosure under
section 74-105, Idaho Code, except that any law enforcement officer or law
enforcement agency, whether inside or outside the state of Idaho, may access
the record system for the purpose of verifying current enhanced licensee
status.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.